Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-204
Additional taxes; authorized.

A city of the primary class shall have the power to levy any other tax or special assessment authorized by law and to appropriate money and provide for the payment of the debts and expenses of the city.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, II, p. 126;

R.S.1913, § 4417;

C.S.1922, § 3801;

C.S.1929, § 15-204;

R.S.1943, § 15-204;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 24.